Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 716.11, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: c. A telecommunications or service, information service, or cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Â§153, a wireless service as defined in section 8C.2, or a broadband generation, transmission, or delivery system. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 879, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor